Colorado, session 2026A, SB042.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Section 20 (2)(e) of article X of the state constitution exempts
"collections for another government" and "damage awards" from "fiscal
year spending", as defined in section 20 (2)(e) of article X of the state
constitution;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) Under the existing statutory definition of "damage award", some
money that the state collects as fines or penalties for violations of certain
legal requirements is treated as state fiscal year spending when determining
whether the state has exceeded the state's fiscal year spending limit despite
the constitutional exemption for such collections;
(c) It is inconsistent with section 20 of article X of the state
constitution to treat money that the state collects as fines or penalties for
violations of certain legal requirements as state revenue in light of the
specific exemption for "damage awards";
(d) (I) Under the existing definition of "collections for another
government", some money that the state collects from taxes on gasoline that
is used as fuel for the propulsion of certain aircraft and that is distributed to
other governmental or airport entities is treated as state fiscal year spending
when determining whether the state has exceeded the state's fiscal year
spending limit despite the constitutional exemption for such collections;
(II) It is inconsistent with section 20 of article X of the state
constitution to treat money that the state collects from the excise tax and
sales and use tax on gasoline that is used as fuel for the propulsion of
certain aircraft and that is distributed to other governmental and airport
entities as state fiscal year spending in light of the specific exemption for
"collections for another government";
(e) (I) Under the existing definition of "collections for another
government", some money that the state collects from the fee for criminal
history record checks that is transmitted to the federal bureau of
investigation for the portions of such criminal history record checks
conducted by the federal government is treated as state fiscal year spending
when determining whether the state has exceeded the state's fiscal year
spending limit despite the constitutional exemption for such collections;
(II) It is inconsistent with section 20 of article X of the state
constitution to treat money that the state collects from the fee for criminal
history record checks and that is transmitted to the federal bureau of
investigation as state fiscal year spending in light of the specific exemption
for "collections for another government"; and
(f) Nothing in this act operates to exclude any money that has been
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-042

included as "collections for another government" or "damage awards" under
the preexisting definition of those terms from the clarified definitions of
those terms in this act - that money continues to be included in these
clarified definitions.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-77-102, amend
(1)(b), (2)(a), (2)(b)(IV), and (2)(b)(V); and add (1)(e), (1)(f), and (2)(c) as
follows:
24-77-102. Definitions.
As used in this article 77, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) (b) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1)(b)(IV)
OF THIS SECTION, for state fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, 2023,
notwithstanding the definition of "collections for another government" in
subsection (1)(a) of this section, the only revenues collected by the state for
the benefit and use of another government other than the state and passed
through to that government other than the state for the benefit of and use by
that government that qualify as "collections for another government"
without further identification by the general assembly are revenues collected
pursuant to:
(I) The authority of the government for whose benefit the state
collects the revenue;
(II) The authority of the state and apportioned to another
government in connection with that government forgoing the imposition of
certain taxes and collecting the corresponding tax revenue; or
(III) A constitutional requirement that the state collect the revenue
for the benefit of another government; OR
(IV) FOR STATE FISCAL YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JULY 1,
2025:
(A) THE AUTHORITY OF THE STATE TO COLLECT AN EXCISE TAX AND
SALES AND USE TAX ON GASOLINE THAT IS USED AS JET FUEL AND
DISTRIBUTE THE REVENUE TO A NON-STATE ENTITY; AND
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-042

(B) THE AUTHORITY OF THE STATE TO COLLECT A FEE FOR CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD CHECKS, A PORTION OF WHICH IS TRANSMITTED TO THE
FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR THE REQUIRED FEDERAL
COMPONENT OF SUCH RECORD CHECKS.
(e) "COLLECTIONS FOR ANOTHER GOVERNMENT", WITH RESPECT TO
REVENUE THAT IS COLLECTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(1)(b)(IV)(A) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING REVENUE THAT
IS PLACED IN OR CREDITED TO THE AVIATION FUND CREATED IN SECTION
43-10-109 AND DISTRIBUTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 43-10-110 TO
GOVERNMENTAL OR AIRPORT ENTITIES OPERATING AN FAA-DESIGNATED
PUBLIC-USE AIRPORT:
(I) REVENUE FROM THE EXCISE TAX ON GASOLINE USED AS FUEL FOR
THE PROPULSION OF NONTURBO-PROPELLER, NONJET ENGINE,
TURBO-PROPELLER, OR JET ENGINE AIRCRAFT COLLECTED BY THE STATE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-27-102 (1)(a)(IV) THAT IS PLACED IN THE
AVIATION FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-27-112 (2)(b); AND
(II) REVENUE FROM THE SALES AND USE TAXES COLLECTED DURING
A FISCAL YEAR BY THE STATE PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 39-26-104 AND
39-26-202 ON AVIATION FUELS USED IN TURBO-PROPELLER OR JET ENGINE
AIRCRAFT THAT IS CREDITED TO THE AVIATION FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION
43-10-109 (2)(a)(I).
(f) "COLLECTIONS FOR ANOTHER GOVERNMENT", WITH RESPECT TO
REVENUE THAT IS RECEIVED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(1)(b)(IV)(B) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDES THE FEE REVENUES THAT ARE
COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY FOR THE PURPOSE OF
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECKS PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-33.5-426
AND THAT IS TRANSMITTED TO THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR
A REQUIRED FEDERAL COMPONENT OF SUCH CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
CHECKS.
(2) "Damage award" means any pecuniary compensation received
by the state as a result of:
(a) Any judgment or allowance in favor of the state; and
(b) For state fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, 2024:
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-042

(IV) A monetary fine or penalty collected by the division of
administration of the department of public health and environment pursuant
to section 25-7-115, 25-7-122, or 25-7-123 and deposited in the community
impact cash fund created in section 25-7-129 or in the motor vehicle
emissions assistance fund created in section 25-7-129.5; and
(V) A monetary penalty collected by the division of labor standards
and statistics of the department of labor and pursuant to section 8-1-114;
AND
(c) FOR STATE FISCAL YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JULY 1,
2025, MONEY DEPOSITED IN THE CRIME VICTIM COMPENSATION FUND OF
EACH JUDICIAL DISTRICT PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-4.1-117 (2) INCLUDING
ALL MONEY PAID AS A COST OR SURCHARGE LEVIED ON CRIMINAL ACTIONS
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-4.1-119; ALL MONEY RECEIVED FROM ANY ACTION
OR SUIT TO RECOVER DAMAGES FROM AN ASSAILANT FOR A COMPENSABLE
CRIME WHICH WAS THE BASIS FOR APPROVAL OF, AND LIMITED TO,
COMPENSATION RECEIVED UNDER PART 1 OF ARTICLE 4.1 OF THIS TITLE 24;
AND ANY RESTITUTION PAID BY AN ASSAILANT TO A VICTIM FOR DAMAGES
FOR A COMPENSABLE CRIME WHICH WAS THE BASIS FOR APPROVAL OF
COMPENSATION RECEIVED UNDER PART 1 OF ARTICLE 4.1 OF THIS TITLE 24
AND FOR DAMAGES FOR WHICH THE VICTIM HAS RECEIVED APPROVAL OF,
AND LIMITED TO, COMPENSATION RECEIVED UNDER PART 1 OF ARTICLE 4.1
OF THIS TITLE 24.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-4.1-117, amend (5)
as follows:
24-4.1-117. Fund created - control of fund.
(5) (a) FOR STATE FISCAL YEARS COMMENCING PRIOR TO JULY 1,
2026, all money deposited in the fund must be used solely for the
compensation of victims pursuant to this part 1; except that the district
attorney and the court executive may use an aggregate of no more than
twenty-two and one-half percent of the total amount of money in the crime
victim compensation fund for administrative costs incurred pursuant to this
part 1. The district attorney may use no more than twenty percent of the
total amount of money in the fund for administrative costs. The court
executive may use no more than two and one-half percent of the total
amount of money in the fund for administrative costs.
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-042

(b) FOR STATE FISCAL YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JULY 1,
2026:
(I) ALL MONEY DEPOSITED IN THE FUND MUST BE USED SOLELY FOR
THE COMPENSATION OF VICTIMS PURSUANT TO THIS PART 1; AND
(II) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL APPROPRIATE MONEY TO THE
DISTRICT ATTORNEY IN EACH JUDICIAL DISTRICT IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO
TWENTY PERCENT OF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF MONEY IN THE FUND IN THAT
JUDICIAL DISTRICT FOR ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS AND TO THE COURT
EXECUTIVE IN EACH JUDICIAL DISTRICT IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO TWO AND
ONE-HALF PERCENT OF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF MONEY IN THE FUND IN THAT
JUDICIAL DISTRICT FOR ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS.
SECTION 4. Appropriation. For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$2,250,000 is appropriated to the judicial department for use by state courts
administration. This appropriation is from the general fund. To implement
this act, the state courts may use this appropriation for Victims'
Compensation Administration.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-042

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-042